Utah statutes.
31A-9-504.   Rehabilitation or involuntary conversion.
(1) (a)  If the commissioner believes that a fraternal does not satisfy the
requirements of this chapter, the commissioner shall call a hearing.  If the
commissioner then finds that the fraternal does not satisfy the requirements:
(i)  if the fraternal is domestic, the commissioner shall petition for
rehabilitation under Section 31A-27a-207 to rehabilitate the fraternal or, if
that is not possible, convert the fraternal to a mutual; or
(ii)  if the fraternal is nondomestic, the commissioner shall order it to
comply as soon as practicable with the requirements of this chapter or lose
its tax exemption.
(b)  An order issued under Subsection (1)(a)(ii) shall specify the ways the
nondomestic fraternal does not comply with this chapter.
(2)  If the fraternal does not promptly comply with the requirements of this
chapter, after notice of the adverse results of a hearing under Subsection
(1), it is subject to taxation as a mutual life insurance company.  This tax
is retroactive to the date on which the commissioner gave the fraternal notice
of the hearing under Subsection (1).
